Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2082
Department; adopt rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing the recordation, acquisition, compilation, and dissemination of all data collected pursuant to sections 71-2078 to 71-2082.

Laws 1993, LB 387, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 611;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 519.